Nevada, session 83, SB314.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 389.520 is hereby amended to read as follows:
389.520 1. The Council shall:
(a) Establish standards of content and performance, including,
without limitation, a prescription of the resulting level of
achievement, for the grade levels set forth in subsection 5, based
upon the content of each course, that is expected of pupils for the
following courses of study:
(1) English language arts;
(2) Mathematics;
(3) Science;
(4) Social studies, which includes only the subjects of
history, geography, economics, civics, financial literacy and
multicultural education;
(5) The arts;
(6) Computer education and technology, which includes
computer science and computational thinking;
(7) Health;
(8) Physical education; and
(9) A foreign or world language.
(b) Establish a schedule for the periodic review and, if
necessary, revision of the standards of content and performance. The
review must include, without limitation, the review required
-
*SB314_R1*

– 3 –
pursuant to NRS 390.115 of the results of pupils on the
examinations administered pursuant to NRS 390.105.
(c) Assign priorities to the standards of content and performance
relative to importance and degree of emphasis and revise the
standards, if necessary, based upon the priorities.
2. The standards for computer education and technology must
include a policy for the ethical, safe and secure use of computers
and other electronic devices. The policy must include, without
limitation:
(a) The ethical use of computers and other electronic devices,
including, without limitation:
(1) Rules of conduct for the acceptable use of the Internet
and other electronic devices; and
(2) Methods to ensure the prevention of:
(I) Cyber-bullying;
(II) Plagiarism; and
(III) The theft of information or data in an electronic
form;
(b) The safe use of computers and other electronic devices,
including, without limitation, methods to:
(1) Avoid cyber-bullying and other unwanted electronic
communication, including, without limitation, communication with
on-line predators;
(2) Recognize when an on-line electronic communication is
dangerous or potentially dangerous; and
(3) Report a dangerous or potentially dangerous on-line
electronic communication to the appropriate school personnel;
(c) The secure use of computers and other electronic devices,
including, without limitation:
(1) Methods to maintain the security of personal identifying
information and financial information, including, without limitation,
identifying unsolicited electronic communication which is sent for
the purpose of obtaining such personal and financial information for
an unlawful purpose;
(2) The necessity for secure passwords or other unique
identifiers;
(3) The effects of a computer contaminant;
(4) Methods to identify unsolicited commercial material; and
(5) The dangers associated with social networking Internet
sites; and
(d) A designation of the level of detail of instruction as
appropriate for the grade level of pupils who receive the instruction.
3. The standards for social studies must include multicultural
education, including, without limitation, information relating to
contributions made by men and women from various racial and
-
*SB314_R1*

– 4 –
ethnic backgrounds. The Council shall consult with members of the
community who represent the racial and ethnic diversity of this
State in developing such standards.
4. The standards for health must include mental health
education and the relationship between mental health and physical
health. The standards for mental health education must:
(a) Correspond with any social and emotional learning
standards developed by the Department;
(b) Include, without limitation, the provision of information
concerning mental health, the promotion of mental health and
culturally appropriate and age-appropriate mental health
resources to pupils; and
(c) Require the use of evidence-based mental health
curriculum.
5. The Council shall establish standards of content and
performance for each grade level in kindergarten and grades 1 to 8,
inclusive, for English language arts and mathematics. The Council
shall establish standards of content and performance for the grade
levels selected by the Council for the other courses of study
prescribed in subsection 1.
6. The Council shall forward to the State Board the standards
of content and performance established by the Council for each
course of study. The State Board shall:
(a) Adopt the standards for each course of study, as submitted
by the Council; or
(b) If the State Board objects to the standards for a course of
study or a particular grade level for a course of study, return those
standards to the Council with a written explanation setting forth the
reason for the objection.
7. If the State Board returns to the Council the standards of
content and performance for a course of study or a grade level, the
Council shall:
(a) Consider the objection provided by the State Board and
determine whether to revise the standards based upon the objection;
and
(b) Return the standards or the revised standards, as applicable,
to the State Board.
 The State Board shall adopt the standards of content and
performance or the revised standards, as applicable.
8. The Council shall work in cooperation with the State Board
to prescribe the examinations required by NRS 390.105.
9. As used in this section:
(a) “Computer contaminant” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 205.4737.
-
*SB314_R1*

– 5 –
(b) “Cyber-bullying” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 388.123.
(c) “Electronic communication” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 388.124.
(d) “Mental health resources” means information a pupil may
use to address a mental health concern, including, without
limitation, information:
(1) That a pupil may use to seek help for mental health
treatment;
(2) Relating to the services of mental health workers,
counselors, psychologists or community-based medical or
behavioral providers of health care, which are provided by the
board of trustees of a school district or the governing body of a
charter school; and
(3) Relating to suicide awareness and prevention.
Sec. 2. Chapter 391 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Each licensed teacher employed at a public school,
including, without limitation, a charter school, who is initially
hired:
(a) On or before July 1, 2027, except for a teacher who is
licensed only as a substitute teacher, must, on or before July 1,
2027, complete a course in mental health education approved by
the Department.
(b) After July 1, 2027, except for a teacher who is licensed only
as a substitute teacher, must complete a course in mental health
education approved by the Department within his or her first year
of employment, unless the teacher submits to the public school
proof that the teacher previously completed such a course while
employed at a different public school.
2. The Department shall adopt regulations that prescribe the
required contents of a course in mental health education which
must be completed pursuant to this section and the process
through which the Department will approve a course in mental
health education.
3. A course in mental health education may be offered by:
(a) A postsecondary educational institution in this State; or
(b) At no cost to a teacher required to complete the course
pursuant to this section, a school district or regional training
program.
4. Each public school, including, without limitation, each
charter school, in this State shall keep an accurate record of the
completion of a course in mental health education for each
licensed teacher employed at the school. The Department may
-
*SB314_R1*

– 6 –
perform an inspection of such records to ensure compliance with
the provisions of this section.
5. As used in this section, “regional training program” has
the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 391A.105.
Sec. 3. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 4. Chapter 391A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Each school district and the governing body of each
charter school shall provide professional development training
regarding mental health education that satisfies the requirements
of section 2 of this act to teachers. Such professional development
training may be provided by the school district or governing body
or through an agreement with an institution of higher education
or a regional training program for the professional development
of teachers and administrators.
2. Each school district and charter school shall, as
applicable, enter into agreements with the Nevada System of
Higher Education and other school districts and charter schools to
provide such professional development training online and to
public schools located in rural areas.
Sec. 5. NRS 391A.345 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391A.345 As used in NRS 391A.345 to 391A.385, inclusive,
and section 4 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires,
“professional development training” has the meaning ascribed to
“professional development” in 20 U.S.C. § 7801(42).
Sec. 6. NRS 391A.370 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391A.370 1. The State Board shall adopt regulations
prescribing standards for the professional development training
provided to teachers and administrators employed by a school
district or charter school.
2. The board of trustees of each school district and the
governing body of each charter school shall ensure that the teachers
and administrators employed by the school district or charter school
have access to high-quality, ongoing professional development
training. The professional development training must meet the
standards prescribed by the State Board pursuant to subsection 1 and
include, without limitation, training concerning:
(a) The academic standards adopted by the State Board,
including, without limitation, the academic standards for science.
(b) The academic standards and curriculum in English language
development and literacy.
(c) The curriculum and instruction required for courses of study
in:
-
*SB314_R1*

– 7 –
(1) Science, technology, engineering and mathematics,
including, without limitation and to the extent applicable, computer
science and computer education and technology.
(2) English language development and literacy.
(d) The cultural competency required to meet the social,
emotional and academic needs of certain categories of pupils
enrolled in the school, including, without limitation, pupils who are
at risk, pupils who are English learners, pupils with disabilities and
gifted and talented pupils.
(e) Mental health education, including, without limitation, any
social and emotional learning standards developed by the
Department.
3. Professional development training concerning the
curriculum and instruction required for courses of study in computer
science and computer education and technology may be provided by
the school district or governing body or through an agreement with
an institution of higher education, a regional training program for
the professional development of teachers and administrators or the
Department. If the professional development training is provided
through an agreement with the Department, the professional
development training may include content contributed by a third
party if the content is approved by the Department for the purpose
of professional development training.
Sec. 7. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Section 1 of this act becomes effective on July 1, 2026.
3. Sections 2 to 6, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On July 1, 2027, for all other purposes.
H
-
*SB314_R1*